Missouri, session 2026, SB1504.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 376, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 376.684, to read as
follows:
376.684. 1. As used in this section, unless the
context indicates otherwise, the following terms mean:
(1) "Ambulance provider", any ambulance service, as
defined in section 190.100. The term "ambulance provider"
shall not include an air ambulance provider;
(2) "Clean claim", a claim that has no defect or
impropriety, including any lack of required substantiating
documentation or particular circumstance requiring special
treatment that prevents timely payment from being made on
the claim;
(3) "Covered services", those emergency ambulance
services that an enrollee is entitled to receive under the
terms of a health benefit plan;
(4) "Enrollee", the same meaning given to the term in
section 376.1350;
(5) "Health benefit plan", the same meaning given to
the term in section 376.1350;

SB 1504 2
(6) "Health carrier", the same meaning given to the
term in section 376.1350;
(7) "Out-of-network ambulance provider", an ambulance
provider that does not contract with the health carrier of
the enrollee receiving the covered services.
2. The minimum allowable reimbursement rate under any
health benefit plan issued by any health carrier to an out-
of-network ambulance provider for providing emergency
services shall be:
(1) At the rates set or approved, whether in contract
or ordinance, by a local governmental entity in the
jurisdiction in which the covered services originate, or as
provided for in section 190.105; or
(2) In the absence of rates as provided in subdivision
(1) of this subsection, three hundred twenty-five percent of
the current published rate for ambulance services, as
established by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services under Title XVIII of the Social Security Act for
the same service provided in the same geographic area, or
the ambulance provider's billed charges, whichever is less.
3. Payment made in compliance with this section shall
be considered payment in full for the covered services
provided, except for any co-payment, coinsurance,
deductible, and other cost-sharing amounts required to be
paid by the enrollee. An ambulance provider is prohibited
from billing the enrollee for any additional amounts for
paid covered services.
4. All co-payment, coinsurance, deductible, and other
cost-sharing amounts provided by subsection 3 of this
section shall not exceed the in-network co-payment,
coinsurance, deductible, and other cost-sharing amounts for
the covered services received by the enrollee.

SB 1504 3
5. A health carrier shall, within thirty days after
receipt of a clean claim for covered services, promptly
remit payment for ambulance services directly to the
ambulance provider and shall not send payment to an enrollee.
6. If the claim is not a clean claim, the health
carrier shall, within thirty days after receipt of the
claim, send a written notice acknowledging the date of the
receipt of the claim and shall specify:
(1) That the health carrier is declining to pay all or
part of the claim and the specific reason or reasons for the
denial; or
(2) That additional information is necessary to
determine if all or part of the claim is payable and the
specific additional information that is required.
7. To the extent that this section conflicts with
section 376.690 or any other provision of law, this section
shall prevail.
✓